Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3149.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 37-7-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 37-7 entitled "Management
and Disposal of Property" is hereby amended to read as follows:
37-7-9. Concessions, leases, and licenses — Reports.
(a) The acquiring authority, with the approval of the state properties committee, is
authorized and empowered, when it shall serve the public purpose, to grant concessions in or to
lease or license any land or building or structure, a part or portion of any governmental facility,
public work, or public improvement for industrial or commercial purposes for a term or terms not
exceeding in the aggregate in any one case twenty (20) years; provided, however, that real property,
buildings, and facilities owned by the state at the Port of Galilee in Narragansett, State Pier #9 in
Newport, Chase Marina in Tiverton, and all other ports and marine facilities owned and operated
by the department of environmental management may be leased for a term of up to forty (40) years
for commercial fishing industry-related purposes; and provided further, however, that certain real
property, buildings, and facilities owned by the state located on Indian Point with a 2012 address
of 25 India Street in the city of Providence may be leased for a term of up to forty (40) years for
commercial, public recreation, marina, and redevelopment purposes; provided, however, that real
property, buildings, and facilities owned by the department of environmental management may be
leased for a term not to exceed forty (40) years for the purpose of facilitating private investment in
buildings or infrastructure for public recreation, or to develop or sustain a natural resource-based

industry and where the useful life of the investment exceeds twenty-five (25) years; and provided
further, however, that certain real properties, buildings, and facilities owned by the state in the city
of Providence known as the Union Station properties, which properties have been conveyed from
time to time to the state by the consolidated rail corporation and others, may be leased for a term
of up to forty (40) years for office, commercial, service, transportation, or other related purposes;
and provided further, however, that real property, buildings, and facilities owned by the state may
be leased for a term of up to forty (40) years for the development of cogeneration projects which
involve the simultaneous generation of electricity and thermal energy (steam and hot water) and
for eligible renewable energy resources as defined in § 39-26-5(a)(i) through (v); and further
provided, however, that in the event of a mobile home lease agreement or site lease agreement,
wherein such mobile home is contiguous to a resident-owned mobile home park, the state properties
committee may enter into a lease or grant concessions to or license any land or building for a period
not to exceed thirty (30) years; and provided further, however, that real property, buildings, and
facilities owned by the state may be leased for a term of up to ninety-nine (99) years for the
development of railroad layover facilities, contingent on the lease requiring the lessee to provide
commuter rail service within the state of Rhode Island, as set forth by the state; and provided
further, however, that real property, buildings, and facilities owned by the state at the Quonset state
airport may be leased to the United States Air Force for a term not to exceed forty (40) years for
the purpose of making improvements to infrastructure thereon. All agreements, contracts, and other
instruments granting concessions or leasing or licensing facilities shall contain such conditions,
rules, restrictions, and regulations as the state purchasing agent shall deem suitable or necessary
and shall be approved, as to substance, by the director of administration, and, as to form, by the
attorney general.
(b) Whenever property that is subject to the provisions of this chapter is leased by the state,
the lessee shall report on a semi-annual basis the amount of income revenue generated by the leased
property. The report shall be made to the state properties commission and copies shall be provided
to both the house and senate fiscal staffs and the governor. These requirements shall be contained
in the lease between the lessor and the lessee with approval of the state properties committee.
SECTION 2. Section 46-5-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 46-5 entitled "Construction
of Port Facilities" is hereby amended to read as follows:
46-5-10. Lease of facilities.
The director may from time to time, in the name of the state of Rhode Island, lease any
property, whether improved or unimproved, acquired by purchase or by the process of law, and
storage facilities, wharves, piers, bulkheads, docks, sheds, warehouses, and industrial locations
LC004957 - Page 2 of 4

within the director’s charge, for such term or terms not exceeding twenty (20) years, except for the
port of Galilee in Narragansett, State Pier #9 in Newport, Chase Marina in Tiverton, and all other
ports and marine facilities owned and operated by the department of environmental management
in which property may be leased for a term of up to forty (40) years for commercial fishing industry-
related purposes and for any rent and with such provisions and covenants as to the director shall
seem to be advantageous to the state.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004957
========
LC004957 - Page 3 of 4